Utah statutes.
20A-14-105.   Becoming a candidate for membership on the State Board of Education -- Selection of candidates by the governor -- Ballot placement.

(1)  By August 1 of each regular general election year, the governor shall:

(a)  for each state board district subject to election in that year, select two candidates for the State Board of Education from the lists submitted by the state board district nominating and recruiting committee; and

(b)  certify the names of the two candidates from each school board district to the lieutenant governor.

(2)  If the governor fails to select two candidates for a state board district by August 1, the nominating and recruiting committee shall:

(a)  select the two candidates; and

(b)  notify the lieutenant governor of its selections by August 31.

(3)  In accordance with Section 20A-6-305, the lieutenant governor shall certify the names and order of the names to the county clerks for placement on the nonpartisan section of the ballot.

